Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 4. Administration and Judicial Review.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Sec. 45.56.600.
Administration.

The department shall administer this chapter.

The administrator or an officer, employee, or designee of the administrator may not use for personal benefit or the benefit of others records or other information obtained by or filed with the administrator that is not public under AS

45.56.620(b)

. This chapter does not authorize the administrator or an officer, employee, or designee of the administrator to disclose the record or information, except in accordance with AS

45.56.620(c)

,

45.56.630

, or

45.56.680

.

This chapter does not create or diminish a privilege or exemption that exists at common law, by statute or regulation, or otherwise.

The administrator may develop and implement investor education initiatives to inform the public about investing in securities, with particular emphasis on the prevention and detection of securities fraud. In developing and implementing these initiatives, the administrator may collaborate with public and nonprofit organizations with an interest in investor education. The administrator may accept a grant or donation from a person that is not affiliated with the securities industry or from a nonprofit organization, regardless of whether the organization is affiliated with the securities industry, to develop and implement investor education initiatives. This subsection does not authorize the administrator to require participation or monetary contributions of a registrant in an investor education program.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.605; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.610.
Administrative files and opinions.

The administrator shall maintain, or designate a person to maintain, a register of applications for registration of securities; registration statements; notice filings; applications for registration of broker-dealers, agents, investment advisors, and investment adviser representatives; notice filings by federal covered investment advisors that are or have been effective under this chapter or former AS 45.55; notices of claims of exemption from registration or notice filing requirements contained in a record; orders issued under this chapter or former AS 45.55; and interpretative opinions or no-action determinations issued under this chapter. The register must be kept according to the existing retention schedule mandated by the department.

The administrator shall make all regulations, forms, interpretative opinions, and orders available to the public.

The administrator shall furnish a copy of a record that is a public record or a certification that the public record does not exist to a person upon request. A copy of the record certified or a certificate by the administrator of a record’s nonexistence is prima facie evidence of a record or its nonexistence.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.620.
Public records; confidentiality.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, records obtained by the administrator or filed under this chapter, including a record contained in or filed with a registration statement, application, notice filing, or report are public records and are available for public examination under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

(Alaska Public Records Act).

The following records are not public records under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

(Alaska Public Records Act) and are not available for public examination under (a) of this section:

a record obtained by the administrator in connection with an audit, examination or inspection under AS

45.56.420(d)

or an investigation under

45.56.680

;

a part of a record filed in connection with a registration statement under AS

45.56.100

and

45.56.170

—

45.56.190

or a record under AS

45.56.420(d)

that contains trade secrets or confidential information if the person filing the registration statement or report has asserted a claim of confidentiality or privilege that is authorized by law;

a record that is not required to be provided to the administrator or filed under this chapter and is provided to the administrator only on the condition that the record may not be subject to public examination or disclosure;

a nonpublic record received from a person specified in AS

45.56.630(a)

; and

a social security number, residential address unless used as a business address, and residential telephone number unless used as a business telephone number, contained in a record that is filed.

If disclosure is for the purpose of a civil, administrative, or criminal investigation, action, or proceeding or to a person specified in AS

45.56.630(a)

, the administrator may disclose a record obtained in connection with an audit or inspection under AS

45.56.420(d)

or a record obtained in connection with an investigation under AS

45.56.680

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.615; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.630.
Uniformity and cooperation with other agencies.

The administrator may cooperate, coordinate, consult, and, subject to AS

45.56.620

, share records and information with the securities regulator of another state, Canada, a Canadian province or territory, a foreign jurisdiction, the Securities and Exchange Commission, the United States Department of Justice, the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, the Federal Trade Commission, the Securities Investor Protection Corporation, a self-regulatory organization, a national or international organization of securities regulators, a federal or state banking and insurance regulator, and a governmental law enforcement agency to bring about greater uniformity in securities matters among the federal government, self-regulatory organizations, states, and foreign governments.

In cooperating, coordinating, consulting, and sharing records and information under this section and in acting by regulation, order, or waiver under this chapter, the administrator may take into consideration in carrying out the public interest the following general policies:

maximizing effectiveness of regulation for the protection of investors;

maximizing uniformity in federal and state regulatory standards; and

minimizing burdens on the business of capital formation, without adversely affecting essentials of investor protection.

The cooperation, coordination, consultation, and sharing of records and information authorized by this section includes

establishing or employing one or more designees as a central depository for registration and notice filings under this chapter and for records required or allowed to be maintained under this chapter;

developing and maintaining uniform forms;

conducting a joint examination or investigation;

holding a joint administrative hearing;

instituting and prosecuting a joint civil or administrative proceeding;

sharing and exchanging personnel;

coordinating registrations under AS

45.56.100

and

45.56.300

—

45.56.350

and exemptions under AS

45.56.150

;

sharing and exchanging records, subject to AS

45.56.620

;

formulating regulations, statements of policy, guidelines, forms, and interpretative opinions and releases;

formulating common systems and procedures;

notifying the public of proposed regulations, forms, statements of policy, and guidelines;

attending conferences and other meetings among securities regulators, that may include representatives of governmental and private sector organizations involved in capital formation, considered necessary or appropriate to promote or achieve uniformity; and

developing and maintaining a uniform exemption from registration for small issuers and taking other steps to reduce the burden of raising investment capital by small businesses.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.620

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.640.
Securities investor education and training fund.

The securities investor education and training fund is created as a special fund in the general fund to provide funds for the purposes specified in AS

45.56.600(d)

. The legislature may appropriate 33 percent of the money received by this state from civil penalties under this chapter into the fund for securities investor education and training. Nothing in this section exempts money deposited into the fund from the requirements of AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act) or dedicates money for a specific purpose.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.625; renumbered in 2018, at which time a reference to another renumbered section was conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.650.
Service of process.

A consent to service of process complying with this section required by this chapter shall be signed and filed in the form required by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter. A consent appointing the administrator the person’s agent for service of process in a noncriminal action or proceeding against the person or the person’s successor or personal representative under this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter after the consent is filed has the same force and validity as if the service were made personally on the person filing the consent. A person that has filed a consent under this subsection in connection with a previous application for registration or notice filing need not file an additional consent.

If a person, including a nonresident of this state, engages in an act, practice, or course of business prohibited or made actionable by this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter and the person has not filed a consent to service of process under (a) of this section, the act, practice, or course of business constitutes the appointment of the administrator as the person’s agent for service of process in a noncriminal action or proceeding against the person or the person’s successor or personal representative.

Service under (a) or (b) of this section may be made by providing a copy of the process to the office of the administrator, but the service is not effective unless

the plaintiff, which may be the administrator, promptly sends notice of the service and a copy of the process, return receipt requested, to the defendant or respondent at the address set out in the consent to service of process or, if a consent to service of process has not been filed, at the last known address, or takes other reasonable steps to give notice; and

the plaintiff files an affidavit of compliance with this subsection in the action or proceeding on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within the time that the court, or the administrator in a proceeding before the administrator, allows.

Service under (c) of this section may be used in a proceeding before the administrator or by the administrator in a civil action in which the administrator is the moving party.

If process is served under (c) of this section, the court, or the administrator in a proceeding before the administrator, shall order continuances as are necessary or appropriate to afford the defendant or respondent reasonable opportunity to defend.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.630

; renumbered in 2018.

Cross references. —

For the effect of subsections (c) — (e) on Rules 4 and 5, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see sec. 30(a), ch. 65, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.660.
Applicability of the chapter.

Unless the persons are exempt elsewhere in this chapter, this chapter applies to persons who buy or offer to buy when an offer to

buy is made in this state; or

sell is made and accepted in this state.

Unless the person is exempt elsewhere in this chapter, this chapter applies to a person who sells or offers to sell when an offer to

sell is made in this state; or

buy is made and accepted in this state.

For the purpose of this section, an offer to sell or to buy is made in this state, whether or not either party is then present in this state, when the offer

originates from this state;

is directed by the offeror to this state and received at the place to which it is directed or at a post office in this state in the case of a mailed offer;

is for an interest or participation in an oil, gas, or mining right, title, or lease on land in this state, including submerged land, regardless of where the offer is made;

is for an interest or participation in payments out of production under an oil, gas, or mining right, title, or lease on land in this state, including submerged land, regardless of where the offer is made;

is for an interest or participation in real property located in this state, or in a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, a limited partnership, a limited liability partnership, an association, or a joint-stock company; jurisdiction under this paragraph may be exercised only when the exercise is consistent with the constitution of this state or of the United States.

For the purpose of this section, an offer to buy or to sell is accepted in this state when acceptance is communicated to the offeror in this state and has not previously been communicated to the offeror, orally or in writing, outside this state. Acceptance is communicated to the offeror in this state, whether or not either party is then present in this state, when the offeree directs the acceptance to the offeror in this state reasonably believing the offeror to be in this state and the acceptance is received at the place to which it is directed or, in the case of a mailed acceptance, at a post office in this state.

This chapter applies to investment advisers, federal covered advisers, and investment adviser representatives when any act instrumental in effecting prohibited conduct is done in this state, regardless of whether either party is then present in this state.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.635; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.670.
Regulations, forms, orders, interpretative opinions, and hearings.

The administrator may

issue forms and orders; after notice and comment, adopt and amend regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out this chapter; and repeal regulations, including regulations and forms governing registration statements, applications, notice filings, reports, and other records;

by regulation, define terms, whether or not used in this chapter, but those definitions may not be inconsistent with this chapter; and

by regulation, classify securities, persons, and transactions and adopt different requirements for different classes.

Under this chapter, a regulation or form may not be adopted or amended, or an order issued or amended, unless the administrator finds that the regulation, form, order, or amendment is necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors and is consistent with the purposes intended by this chapter. In adopting, amending, and repealing regulations and forms, AS

45.56.630

applies to achieve uniformity among the states and coordination with federal laws in the form and content of registration statements, applications, reports, and other records, including the adoption of uniform rules, forms, and procedures.

Subject to 15 U.S.C. 78o(i) and 80b-18a, the administrator may require that a financial statement filed under this chapter be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States and comply with other requirements specified by regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter. A regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may establish

subject to 15 U.S.C. 78o(i) and 80b-18a, the form and content of financial statements required under this chapter;

whether unconsolidated financial statements must be filed; and

whether required financial statements must be audited by an independent certified public accountant.

The administrator may provide interpretative opinions or issue determinations that the administrator will not institute a proceeding or an action under this chapter against a specified person for engaging in a specified act, practice, or course of business if the determination is consistent with this chapter. A regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may establish a reasonable charge for interpretative opinions or determinations that the administrator will not institute an action or a proceeding under this chapter.

A hearing in an administrative proceeding under this chapter shall be conducted in public unless the administrative law judge or the administrator for good cause consistent with this chapter determines that the hearing may not be conducted in public.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to all regulations adopted or authorized under this chapter.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.640

; renumbered in 2018, at which time a reference to another renumbered section was conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.680.
Investigations and subpoenas.

The administrator may

conduct public or private investigations in or outside of this state that the administrator considers necessary or appropriate to determine whether a person has violated, is violating, or is about to violate this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter, or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the adoption of regulations and forms under this chapter;

require or permit a person to testify, file a statement, or produce a record, under oath or otherwise as the administrator determines, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning a matter to be investigated or about which an action or proceeding is to be instituted; and

publish a record concerning an action, proceeding, or an investigation under, or a violation of, this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter if the administrator determines it is necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors.

For the purpose of an investigation under this chapter, the administrator or the designated officer of the administrator may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, seek compulsion of attendance, take evidence, require the filing of statements, and require the production of any records that the administrator considers relevant or material to the investigation.

If a person does not appear or refuses to testify, file a statement, produce records, or otherwise obey a subpoena as required by the administrator under this chapter, the administrator may refer the matter to the attorney general, who may bring an action in the superior court or a court of another state to enforce compliance. The court may

hold the person in contempt;

order the person to appear before the administrator;

order the person to testify about the matter under investigation or in question;

order the production of records;

grant injunctive relief, including restricting or prohibiting the offer or sale of securities or the providing of investment advice;

impose a civil penalty of not more than $100,000 for a single violation; and

grant any other necessary or appropriate relief.

This section does not preclude a person from applying to the superior court or a court of another state for relief from a request to appear, testify, file a statement, produce records, or obey a subpoena.

A person is not excused from attending, testifying, filing a statement, producing a record or other evidence, or obeying a subpoena of the administrator under this chapter or in an action or proceeding instituted by the administrator under this chapter on the ground that the required testimony, statement, record, or other evidence, directly or indirectly, may tend to incriminate the individual or subject the individual to a criminal fine, penalty, or forfeiture. If the person refuses to testify, file a statement, or produce a record or other evidence based on the individual’s privilege against self-incrimination, the administrator may apply to the superior court to compel the testimony, the filing of the statement, the production of the record, or the giving of other evidence. The testimony, record, or other evidence compelled under an order of the superior court may not be used, directly or indirectly, against the individual in a criminal case, except in a prosecution for perjury, contempt, or otherwise failing to comply with the order.

At the request of the securities regulator of another state or a foreign jurisdiction, the administrator may provide assistance if the requesting regulator states that it is conducting an investigation to determine whether a person has violated, is violating, or is about to violate a law or regulation of the other state or foreign jurisdiction relating to securities matters that the requesting regulator administers or enforces. The administrator may provide the assistance by using the authority to investigate and the powers conferred by this section as the administrator determines is necessary or appropriate. The assistance may be provided without regard to whether the conduct described in the request would also constitute a violation of this chapter or other law of this state if occurring in this state. In deciding whether to provide the assistance, the administrator may consider whether the requesting regulator is permitted and has agreed to provide assistance reciprocally within its state or foreign jurisdiction to the administrator on securities matters when requested, whether compliance with the request would violate or prejudice the public policy of this state, and the availability of resources and employees of the administrator to carry out the request for assistance.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.645; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.690.
Administrative enforcement.

If the administrator determines that a person has engaged, is engaging, or is about to engage in an act, practice, or course of business constituting a violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter or that a person has materially aided, is materially aiding, or is about to aid materially an act, practice, or course of business constituting a violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter, the administrator may issue an order

directing the person to cease and desist from engaging in the act, practice, or course of business or to take other action necessary or appropriate to comply with this chapter;

denying, suspending, revoking, or conditioning the exemptions for a broker-dealer under AS

45.56.300(b)(1)(D)

or (F) or an investment adviser under AS

45.56.340(b)(1)(C)

; or

denying, suspending, conditioning, or limiting an exemption as provided under AS

45.56.160

.

An order under (a) of this section is effective on the date of issuance. Upon issuance of the order, the administrator shall promptly serve each person subject to the order with a copy of the order and a notice that the order has been entered. The order must include a statement of any civil penalty, restitution, or costs of investigation the administrator will seek, a statement of the reasons for the order, and notice that, within 15 days after receipt of a request in a record from the person, the matter will be scheduled for a hearing. If a person subject to the order does not request a hearing and none is ordered by the administrator within 30 days after the date of service of the order, the order, including the imposition of a civil penalty, the imposition of restitution, or requirement for payment of the costs of investigation sought in a statement in the order, becomes final as to that person by operation of law. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the administrator, after notice of and opportunity for hearing provided to each person subject to the order, may modify or vacate the order or extend it until final determination.

If a hearing is requested or ordered under (b) of this section, a hearing shall be conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

), and AS

44.64.040

—

44.64.200

apply to and govern the hearing.

In a final order under (b) of this section, the administrator may impose a civil penalty of not more than $100,000 for a single violation, unless the violation of this chapter is against an older person or a vulnerable adult. In addition to a civil penalty imposed under this subsection, a person or entity who engages in conduct prohibited under this chapter against an older person or a vulnerable adult may be liable for an additional civil penalty of treble statutory damages. In determining whether to impose a supplemental civil penalty under this subsection, the administrator shall consider, in addition to other appropriate factors, the extent to which the following factors are present:

whether the respondent knew that the respondent’s conduct was directed to an older person or a vulnerable adult;

whether the respondent’s conduct caused an older person or a vulnerable adult to suffer

severe loss or encumbrance of a primary residence, principal employment, or source of income; or

substantial loss of property set aside for retirement or for personal and family care and maintenance; or

whether the respondent’s conduct caused substantial loss of payments received under a pension or retirement plan or a government benefits program.

In a final order under (b) of this section, the administrator may

impose restitution to any person in interest for any money or property, real or personal, that may have been acquired or transferred in violation of this chapter;

charge the actual cost of an investigation or proceeding for a violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter; and

deny the violator the use of any exemptions listed under this chapter.

The administrator may petition the superior court to enter a judgment against a person who is a respondent in the order for the amount of the civil penalty levied against the person. Subject to AS

44.62.570

, the filing of the petition for a judgment does not reopen the final order to further substantive review. A judgment entered under this subsection may be executed on and levied under in the manner provided in AS 09.35.

If a person does not comply with an order under this section, the administrator may petition a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the order. The court may not require the administrator to post a bond in an action or proceeding under this section. If the court finds, after service and opportunity for hearing, that the person was not in compliance with the order, the court may adjudge the person in civil contempt of the order. The court may impose a further civil penalty against the person for contempt in an amount not less than $5,000 but not greater than $100,000 for each violation and may grant any other relief the court determines is just and proper in the circumstances.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.650

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Cross references. —

For the effect of subsections (f) and (g) on Rules 54 and 90, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see secs. 30(b) and (c), ch. 65, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.700.
Civil enforcement.

If the administrator believes that a person has engaged, is engaging, or is about to engage in an act, practice, or course of business constituting a violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter, or that a person has engaged, is engaging, or is about to engage in an act, practice, or course of business that materially aids a violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter, the administrator may maintain an action in the superior court to enjoin the act, practice, or course of business and to enforce compliance with this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter.

In an action under this section and on a proper showing, the court may

issue a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or declaratory judgment;

order other appropriate or ancillary relief, which may include

an asset freeze, accounting, writ of attachment, writ of general or specific execution, and appointment of a receiver or conservator that may be the administrator for the defendant or the defendant’s assets;

ordering the administrator to take charge and control of a defendant’s property, including investment accounts and accounts in a depository institution, rents, and profits; to collect debts; and to acquire and dispose of property;

imposing a civil penalty of not more than $100,000 for a single violation, unless the violation of this chapter is against an older person or a vulnerable adult; in determining whether to impose a supplemental civil penalty for a violation of this chapter against an older person or a vulnerable adult, the court shall consider, in addition to other appropriate factors, the extent to which the following factors are present:

whether the respondent knew that the respondent’s conduct was directed to an older person or a vulnerable adult;

whether the respondent’s conduct caused an older person or a vulnerable adult to suffer severe loss or encumbrance of a primary residence, principal employment, or source of income; or substantial loss of property set aside for retirement or for personal and family care and maintenance; or

whether the respondent’s conduct caused substantial loss of payments received under a pension or retirement plan or a government benefits program;

imposing an order of rescission, or disgorgement directed to a person that has engaged in an act, practice, or course of business constituting a violation of this chapter or former AS 45.55 or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter or former AS 45.55;

imposing an order of restitution to any person in interest for any money or property, real or personal, that may have been acquired or transferred in violation of this chapter; and

ordering the payment of prejudgment and post judgment interest; or

order other relief that the court considers appropriate.

The administrator may not be required to post a bond in an action or proceeding under this chapter.

After an order issued by the court under (b) of this section becomes final and all rights of appeal are exhausted, the administrator may petition the superior court to enter a judgment against a person who is a respondent in the order for the amount of the civil penalty levied against the person. Subject to AS

44.62.570

, the filing of the petition for a judgment does not reopen the final order to further substantive review. A judgment entered under this subsection may be executed on and levied under in the manner provided in AS 09.35.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.655; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.